Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Chapter 14

Legend Drug and Controlled Substance Research Act of 1984

53-14-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Legend Drug and Controlled Substance Research Act of 1984.”

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 1.

Cross-References. Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, title 53, ch. 1.

Legend drugs, title 53, ch. 10.

Comparative Legislation. Drug research:

Ala. Code § 20-2-52 et seq.

Ark. Code § 5-64-504 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 16-13-52 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 41-29-105 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 195.198.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 90-113.3 et seq.

Va. Code § 54.1-3423 et seq.

Collateral References. Controlled substances
9, 10.

Health
303, 304.

53-14-102. Exemption from chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to:

A licensed physician, dentist or veterinarian lawfully administering, dispensing or prescribing a legend drug or controlled substance in the course of the individual's professional practice to an ultimate user for a recognized medical purpose; or

A manufacturer or distributor whose research protocol has been approved by the federal food and drug administration under that agency's auspices, or otherwise subject to jurisdiction of the federal food and drug administration and if lawful under that jurisdiction.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 2.

53-14-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of pharmacy created by § 63-10-301;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of health;

“Controlled substance analogues” is defined as in § 39-17-454;

“Controlled substances” is defined as in § 39-17-402;

“Director” means the director of the board of pharmacy elected pursuant to § 63-10-303;

“Legend drugs” is defined as in § 53-10-101; and

“Person” means an individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 3; 2012, ch. 848, § 50.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment added the definition of “controlled substance analogues”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-104. License — Required — Application — Fees.

No person shall manufacture, obtain, possess, administer or dispense a legend drug, controlled substance or controlled substance analogue for the purpose of scientific research, chemical analysis, instruction or training of detection animals without having first secured a license to do so from the director.

An application for the license shall be submitted on the prescribed form, and shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), or in an amount set by the board;

Copies of all papers and materials filed with any state or federal governmental agency in connection with the applicant's proposed project; and

A detailed protocol, in triplicate, setting forth:

The nature of the proposed project;

The qualifications of the applicant to engage in the project;

The proposed quantity of each drug involved;

The measures proposed to provide for security and proper record-keeping of the drugs;

Specific provisions for the safe administration or dispensing of drugs to humans, if contemplated, and the proposed method for selecting the humans; and

Other information the commissioner may require.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 4; 1990, ch. 1026, § 14; 2012, ch. 848, § 51.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drug, controlled substance or controlled substance analogue” for “legend drug or controlled substance” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-105. License — Issuance.

Upon approval by the commissioner, the director shall issue a license authorizing the holder to manufacture, obtain, possess, dispense, or administer legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues, or any combination thereof, for the purpose of scientific research, instruction or chemical analysis.

The commissioner shall not grant approval unless the commissioner determines that the applicant:

Has submitted a satisfactory protocol for the proposed project, except as provided in § 53-14-109;

Is of good character;

Possesses, or is capable of acquiring, sufficient staff, facilities and equipment to conduct properly the proposed project;

Is able to maintain effective control against diversion of the drugs for which the license is sought; and

Is able to comply with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations relating to the drugs for which the license is sought.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 5; 2012, ch. 848, § 52.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues, or any combination thereof” for “legend drugs or controlled substances, or both” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-106. License — Contents — Expiration — Nontransferable.

All licenses issued pursuant to § 53-14-105 shall specify:

The name and address of the licensees;

The nature of the authorized project or projects;

The nature of legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues to be used in the project; and

Whether dispensing to human subjects is permitted.

A license shall expire one (1) year from the date of issuance, or upon termination of the authorized project or projects, whichever comes first, and shall be renewable annually at a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00).

No license shall be transferable.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 6; 2012, ch. 848, § 53.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues” for “legend drugs or controlled substances” in (a)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-107. Modification of license.

If any licensee under this chapter wishes to amend the terms or conditions of the licensee's license, the licensee shall make application to the director.

The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of five dollars ($5.00), or other amount set by the board.

The director shall grant the requested amendment upon approval by the commissioner.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 7; 1990, ch. 1026, § 15.

53-14-108. Denial of application for license.

If an application for a license or amendment under this chapter is denied, the director shall notify the applicant in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial.

The applicant may, within thirty (30) days of the date of the notification, submit responsive materials for consideration by the commissioner.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 8.

53-14-109. Institutional applicants for licenses.

Any institution that regularly engages in research, instruction or chemical analysis may apply for a license authorizing internal approval of specific projects conducted under the institution's immediate auspices. The application shall be accompanied by the fee and materials specified in § 53-14-104; provided, that in lieu of a detailed protocol, the institutional applicant may submit a written statement containing:

The qualifications of each member of the committee within the institution that will approve specific projects;

A description of the system within the institution for approving, supervising and evaluating the projects; and

Other information the commissioner may require.

Any institution licensed pursuant to subsection (a) shall maintain for review by the board:

A description of the project, including the names and qualifications of the individuals assigned to work on and supervise the project;

A description of the provisions for safe administration or dispensing of drugs to human subjects, if contemplated; and

Upon request of the commissioner, progress reports, evaluations and revisions, if any, of the project, in a form the commissioner prescribes.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 9.

53-14-110. Records and documents.

All licensees under this chapter shall maintain in a readily retrievable manner for a period of two (2) years:

Records showing the receipt, administration, dispensing or destruction of all legend drugs, controlled substances and controlled substance analogues; and

Copies of any protocols, including revisions of the protocols, progress reports, evaluations and other project documents.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 10; 2012, ch. 848, § 54.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drugs, controlled substances and controlled substance analogues” for “legend drugs and controlled substances” in (1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-111. Inspections.

The board, or its officers, agents or employees, shall periodically inspect the premises of licensees under this chapter for compliance with the submitted protocol, record-keeping and security requirements, and other state and federal laws or regulations relating to legend drugs, controlled substances and controlled substance analogues.

Any applicant for a license under this chapter shall be deemed to have consented to the inspections.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 11; 2012, ch. 848, § 55.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drugs, controlled substances and controlled substance analogues” for “legend drugs and controlled substances” at the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-112. Suspension or revocation of license — Probation.

The board may, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, suspend or revoke any license issued pursuant to this chapter or place on probation any licensee, if the licensee is found to have:

Falsified any application, record, report or information required by this chapter;

Failed to comply with the protocol of a project;

Failed to maintain effective control against diversion of legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues;

Willfully and unreasonably refused to permit an inspection authorized by this chapter;

Been convicted of an offense in any jurisdiction relating to legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues; or

Willfully or negligently violated this chapter or any state or federal drug laws or regulations.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 12; 2012, ch. 848, § 56.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues” for “legend drugs or controlled substances” in (3) and (5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.

53-14-113. Restraining or enjoining violations — Jurisdiction.

The board may seek relief at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any act or practice in violation of this chapter. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery and circuit courts of this state to hear and determine a suit to restrain or enjoin. No bond shall be required for the prosecution of the suit or for the issuance of an injunction.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 13.

53-14-114. Restricted access to information.

Only the following persons shall have a right of access to the names and other identifying characteristics of individuals who are the subjects of research on the use and effects of legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues:

The board;

The director;

The commissioner;

The attorney general and reporter or the attorney general and reporter's designee;

Any person directly connected with the research who has a legitimate need for the information; and

Any federal agency having responsibility for the research project.

Acts 1984, ch. 717, § 14; 2012, ch. 848, § 57.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “legend drugs, controlled substances or controlled substance analogues” for “legend drugs or controlled substances” at the end of the introductory paragraph.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 848, § 99. May 15, 2012.